Colorado, session 2026A, HB1087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Children lack the maturity to make permanent, life-altering
medical and psychological decisions;
(b) Medical and mental health interventions that attempt to alter
a minor's biological sex are experimental and carry serious, irreversible
consequences, including sterility, cognitive impacts, and increased mental
health struggles;
(c) European nations, including Sweden, Finland, and the United
Kingdom, have halted or severely restricted such interventions due to
evidence of harm;
(d) Colorado law already protects children from other life-altering
-2- HB26-1087

decisions, such as consuming alcohol, smoking, and getting tattoos. The
same protections should apply to medical and psychological interventions
related to biological sex.
(e) Parents have the fundamental right to guide their child's
medical and psychological care without coercion from governmental
agencies, schools, or medical professionals.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-30-126 as
follows:
12-30-126. Prohibition on medical and mental health
interventions on minors - parental rights - civil remedy - professional
license revocation - criminal penalties - severability.
(1) A PERSON, HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, OR MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY:
(a) PERFORM SURGERY ON A MINOR WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN
YEARS OLD, OR PRESCRIBE, ADMINISTER, OR PROVIDE HORMONES OR
PUBERTY BLOCKERS TO A MINOR, FOR THE PURPOSE OF ALTERING THE
MINOR'S BIOLOGICAL SEX CHARACTERISTICS; OR
(b) PROVIDE MENTAL HEALTH THERAPY, PROFESSIONAL
COUNSELING, OR REFERRALS THAT PROMOTE OR AFFIRM A MINOR'S BELIEF
THAT THE MINOR WAS BORN IN THE WRONG BODY OR THAT THE MINOR
NEEDS MEDICAL INTERVENTION TO ADDRESS DISTRESS RELATED TO THE
MINOR'S BIOLOGICAL SEX.
(2) THE STATE SHALL NOT INVESTIGATE OR PENALIZE A MINOR'S
PARENT, OR TERMINATE THE PARENT'S RIGHTS, FOR REFUSING TO CONSENT
TO A MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH INTERVENTION DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE MINOR.
(3) A PUBLIC SCHOOL, HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, OR
-3- HB26-1087

GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL NOT WITHHOLD INFORMATION FROM A
MINOR'S PARENT REGARDING THE MINOR'S EXPRESS DESIRE TO TRANSITION
THE MINOR'S BIOLOGICAL SEX.
(4) STATE OR FEDERAL FUNDING, MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT, AND
HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE MUST NOT BE USED TO PAY FOR A
PROHIBITED MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH INTERVENTION DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) A PERSON WHO, AS A MINOR, WAS SUBJECTED, ON OR AFTER
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, TO A PROHIBITED MEDICAL OR
MENTAL HEALTH INTERVENTION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE PERSON, HEALTH-CARE
PROVIDER, OR MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL WHO PERFORMED OR
PROVIDED THE MEDICAL OR HEALTH-CARE INTERVENTION.
NOTWITHSTANDING ARTICLES 80 AND 81 OF TITLE 13 TO THE CONTRARY,
THE PERSON MAY COMMENCE THE ACTION WITHIN TWENTY YEARS AFTER
ATTAINING THE AGE OF EIGHTEEN YEARS.
(6) A REGULATOR SHALL REVOKE A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER'S OR
MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL'S LICENSE FOR VIOLATING THIS SECTION
AND SHALL NOT REINSTATE THE LICENSE.
(7) A PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY VIOLATES THIS SECTION COMMITS
A CLASS 5 FELONY. THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF
VIOLATING THIS SECTION TO THE MAXIMUM TERM OF IMPRISONMENT AND
IMPOSE THE MAXIMUM FINE SET FORTH IN SECTION 18-1.3-401.
(8) IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION OR THE APPLICATION OF
THIS SECTION TO ANY PERSON OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID, THE
INVALIDITY DOES NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OR APPLICATIONS OF
THE SECTION THAT CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID
-4- HB26-1087

PROVISION OR APPLICATION, AND TO THIS END THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION ARE DECLARED TO BE SEVERABLE.
SECTION 3. Applicability. This act applies to offenses
committed on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1087